Illinois, session 104th, HB4863.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Speech-Language Pathology and 5Audiology Practice Act is amended by changing Section 11 as 6follows: 7    (225 ILCS 110/11)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7911)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)9    Sec. 11. Expiration, renewal and restoration of licenses. 10    (a) The expiration date and renewal period for each 11license issued under this Act shall be set by rule. A 12speech-language pathologist, speech-language pathology 13assistant, or audiologist may renew such license during the 14month preceding the expiration date thereof by paying the 15required fee.16    (a-5) An audiologist renewing his or her license shall 17provide proof as determined by the Department of having met 18the continuing education requirements set forth in the rules 19of the Department. At a minimum, the rules shall require a 20renewal applicant for licensure as an audiologist to provide 21proof of completing at least 20 clock hours of continuing 22education during the 2-year licensing cycle for which he or 23she is currently licensed, no more than 10 hours of which may   HB4863- 2 -LRB104 14835 AAS 27979 b1be obtained through programs sponsored by hearing instrument 2or auditory prosthetic device manufacturers. An audiologist 3must provide proof that at least 2 clock hours of training in 4ethics or legal requirements pertaining to the practice of 5audiology was completed during the 2-year licensing cycle for 6which he or she is currently licensed. 7    (a-10) A speech-language pathologist or a speech-language 8pathology assistant renewing his or her license shall provide 9proof as determined by the Department of having met the 10continuing education requirements set forth in the rules of 11the Department. At a minimum, the rules shall require a 12renewal applicant for license as a speech-language pathologist 13to provide proof of completing at least 20 clock hours of 14continuing education during the 2-year licensing cycle for 15which he or she is currently licensed. A speech language 16pathologist must provide proof that at least one clock hour of 17ethics training was completed during the 2-year licensing 18cycle for which he or she is currently licensed. At a minimum, 19the rules shall require a renewal applicant for licensure as a 20speech-language pathology assistant to provide proof of 21completing at least 10 clock hours of continuing education 22during the 2-year period for which he or she currently holds a 23license. At a minimum, the rules shall permit continuing 24education credits to be earned for: (1) verified attendance at 25lectures and scheduled courses or workshops at local, 26regional, national, or international conferences concerning   HB4863- 3 -LRB104 14835 AAS 27979 b1speech-language pathology, audiology, or related disciplines 2if the lectures, scheduled courses, or workshops meet the 3criteria set forth in 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1465.85 (c)(3)(A), 4(B), and (C); (2) verified attendance at lectures, workshops, 5or in-service programs concerning speech-language pathology, 6audiology, or related disciplines if the lectures, workshops, 7or in-service programs meet the criteria set forth in 68 Ill. 8Adm. Code 1465.85 (c)(3)(A), (B), and (C); and (3) 9presentation before an audience of speech-language 10pathologists, audiologists, or related professionals at 11lectures, workshops, or in-service programs concerning 12speech-language pathology, audiology, or related disciplines 13if the lectures, workshops, or in-service programs meet the 14criteria set forth in 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1465.85 (c)(3)(A), 15(B), and (C). 16    (b) Inactive status.17        (1) Any licensee who notifies the Department in 18    writing on forms prescribed by the Department may elect to 19    place his or her license on an inactive status and shall, 20    subject to rules of the Department, be excused from 21    payment of renewal fees until he or she notifies the 22    Department in writing of his or her desire to resume 23    active status.24        (2) Any licensee requesting restoration from inactive 25    status shall be required to (i) pay the current renewal 26    fee; and (ii) demonstrate that he or she has completed a   HB4863- 4 -LRB104 14835 AAS 27979 b1    minimum of 20 hours of continuing education and met any 2    additional continuing education requirements established 3    by the Department by rule.4        (3) Any licensee whose license is in an inactive 5    status shall not practice in the State of Illinois without 6    first restoring his or her license.7        (4) Any licensee who shall engage in the practice 8    while the license is lapsed or inactive shall be 9    considered to be practicing without a license which shall 10    be grounds for discipline under Section 16 of this Act.11    (c) Any speech-language pathologist, speech-language 12pathology assistant, or audiologist whose license has expired 13may have his or her license restored at any time within 5 years 14after the expiration thereof, upon payment of the required 15fee.16    (d) Any person whose license has been expired or inactive 17for 5 years or more may have his or her license restored by 18making application to the Department and filing proof 19acceptable to the Department of his or her fitness to have his 20or her license restored, including sworn evidence certifying 21to active lawful practice in another jurisdiction, and by 22paying the required restoration fee. A person practicing on an 23expired license is deemed to be practicing without a license.24    (e) If a person whose license has expired has not 25maintained active practice in another jurisdiction, the 26Department shall determine, by an evaluation process   HB4863- 5 -LRB104 14835 AAS 27979 b1established by rule, his or her fitness to resume active 2status and may require the person to complete a period of 3evaluated clinical experience, and may require successful 4completion of an examination.5    (f) Any person whose license has expired while he or she 6has been engaged (1) in federal or State service on active 7duty, or (2) in training or education under the supervision of 8the United States preliminary to induction into the military 9service, may have his or her license restored without paying 10any lapsed renewal or restoration fee, if within 2 years after 11termination of such service, training or education he or she 12furnishes the Department with satisfactory proof that he or 13she has been so engaged and that his or her service, training 14or education has been so terminated.15(Source: P.A. 100-530, eff. 1-1-18.)